Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB914.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Chapter 39 of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subchapter to read:SUBCHAPTER CSCRAP MATERIAL THEFT PREVENTIONSec.3950. Scope of subchapter.3951. Definitions.3952. Identification requirements for sale of scrap materials to scrap processors and recycling facility operators.3953. Commercial accounts.3954. Restricted materials.<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021 3955. Law enforcement.3956. Statewide registry of scrap processors and recycling facilities.3957. Duty to register.3958. Penalties.3959. Preemption.§ 3950. Scope of subchapter.This subchapter relates to scrap material theft prevention.§ 3951. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this subchapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Beer keg." A vessel designed to contain at least 128 fluid ounces of malt or brewed beverage."Buyer." The recycling facility operator or the owner, operator or employee of a scrap processor."Catalytic converter." An air pollution abatement device that removes pollutants from motor vehicle exhaust, either by oxidizing the pollutants into carbon dioxide and water or reducing the pollutants to nitrogen."Commercial account." A relationship between a scrap processor and a commercial enterprise that is ongoing and properly documented."Commercial enterprise." A corporation, partnership, limited liability company, single proprietorship, association, State agency, political subdivision of the Commonwealth, public corporation or any other legal or commercial entity."Commercial metal property." The term includes:(1) Utility access covers.(2) Streetlight poles and fixtures.20250SB0914PN1210 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) Road and bridge guardrails.(4) Highway or street signs.(5) Water meter covers.(6) Traffic directional and control signs.(7) Traffic light signals.(8) Any metal property clearly marked with the name of the commercial enterprise, including:(i) A telephone.(ii) Cable.(iii) Electric.(iv) Water.(v) Natural gas.(vi) Other utility or railroad.(9) Unused or undamaged building construction materials consisting of any of the following:(i) Copper pipe, tubing or wiring.(ii) Aluminum wire.(iii) Siding, downspouts or gutters.(iv) Aluminum or stainless steel fence panels.(v) Aluminum decking, bleachers or risers.(10) Historical markers.(11) Statue plaques.(12) Grave markers.(13) Funeral vases.(14) Agricultural irrigation wheels.(15) Sprinkler heads.(16) Pipes."Ferrous metals." Items that are predominantly made from iron or steel that have no further use in the metal's original manufactured form but which can be melted for the metal content 20250SB0914PN1210 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and utilized in the manufacture of new products."Law enforcement officer." A member of the Pennsylvania State Police or an individual employed as a police officer who holds a current certificate under 53 Pa.C.S. Ch. 21 Subch. D (relating to municipal police education and training)."Nonferrous metals." Items that are predominantly made from metals other than iron and steel, including copper, brass, aluminum, bronze, lead, zinc, nickel and alloys that have no further use in the metal's original manufactured form but which can be melted for their metal content and utilized in the manufacture of new products."Processing." Receiving, storing or reselling scrap materials for payment or other financial consideration."Railroad material." The term includes the following:(1) Railroad power and signal equipment.(2) Road or rail crossing signals.(3) Railroad track.(4) Railroad switch components.(5) Railroad spike.(6) Angle/joint bar as used in the jointing of a railroad track.(7) Railroad anchors.(8) Railroad tie plate or bolt used in constructing a railroad."Recycling facility operator." An owner, operator or employee who operates a facility employing a technology that is a process to separate or classify municipal waste and who creates or recovers reusable materials that can be sold to or reused by a manufacturer as a substitute for or a supplement to virgin raw materials. The term does not include a person who 20250SB0914PN1210 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 operates a transfer station or landfill for solid waste, composting facility or resource recovery facility."Scrap processor." An owner, operator or employee who, from a fixed location, utilizes machinery and equipment for processing and manufacturing ferrous metal or nonferrous metal scrap, paper scrap, plastic scrap, rubber scrap or glass scrap into prepared grades and whose principal product is sold as a raw material in the manufacture of new products."Seller." A person, other than a commercial enterprise, who sells scrap materials to a scrap processor or recycling facility operator.§ 3952. Identification requirements for sale of scrap materials to scrap processors and recycling facility operators.(a) Information collection.--A scrap processor and recycling facility operator shall collect the following information for all transactions by a seller of restricted material under section 3954 (relating to restricted materials) and from any other seller when the purchase of scrap material from the seller exceeds $100:(1) A photocopy of the driver's license of the seller.(2) The seller's and buyer's signature for each transaction.(3) The license plate number of the motor vehicle the seller operates at the time of the transaction.(4) Written permission of the seller's parent or legal guardian if the seller is under 18 years of age.(5) The date and time of the transaction.(6) A description of the scrap material included in the transaction, including the weight of the scrap material and the amount paid to the seller.20250SB0914PN1210 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) Tracking the transaction.--A scrap processor and recycling facility operator shall, when payment is made in cash, develop methods of tracking a transaction that obtains the seller's signature on a receipt for the transaction. The receipt shall include a certification that the seller is the owner or authorized seller of the scrap material.(c) Holding period.--(1) (i) Following a verbal or written notification from a law enforcement officer that certain scrap materials have been reported as stolen, a scrap processor or recycling facility operator that is in possession of the scrap material reported as stolen shall hold that scrap material intact and safe from alteration, damage or commingling and shall place an identifying tag or other suitable identification upon the scrap material.(ii) Upon request, a law enforcement officer making a verbal request shall provide the scrap processor or recycling facility operator with the law enforcement officer's name, badge number and department contact telephone number so that the scrap processor or recycling facility operator may call to confirm the identity of the law enforcement officer.(2) Within 24 hours of notification by the law enforcement officer or 24 hours of the receipt of the material, whichever is later, the scrap processor or recycling facility operator shall notify the law enforcement officer that scrap material matching the law enforcement officer's description is on the premises.(3) The scrap processor or recycling facility shall hold the scrap material for a period of time as directed by the 20250SB0914PN1210 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 applicable law enforcement agency, up to a maximum of 48 hours following notification, unless extended under paragraph (5).(4) A law enforcement officer shall not place a hold on any scrap material unless that law enforcement officer reasonably suspects that the scrap material is lost or stolen. Requests for holds shall be in accordance with the following:(i) The request to hold scrap material shall be as specific as possible by using descriptive language, including the type and the style of the material, length or weight or other descriptions to identify the material to be held.(ii) A hold that is placed on scrap material shall not exceed 48 hours, and the scrap material must be returned to the owner or released when the hold has been released or has expired.(5) A holding period may be extended beyond 48 hours only upon the order of a magisterial district judge after the magisterial district judge has determined that probable cause exists that the scrap material is lost or stolen.(6) A scrap processor or recycling facility operator that receives material that does not meet the description of materials being sought by a law enforcement officer may dispose of that material at the scrap processor's or recycling facility operator's discretion.(d) Maintenance of records.--The information required by this section shall be maintained by the scrap processor or recycling facility operator for a minimum of two years from the date of the transaction.20250SB0914PN1210 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 § 3953. Commercial accounts.(a) Duty to create and maintain.--Each scrap processor and recycling facility operator must create and maintain a permanent record with a commercial enterprise, including another scrap metal business, in order to establish a commercial account. The record shall, at a minimum, include the following information:(1) The full name and Federal or State tax identification number of the commercial enterprise or commercial account.(2) The business address and telephone number of the commercial enterprise or commercial account.(b) Additional information.--The record for each commercial enterprise maintained by the scrap processor or recycling facility operator shall document every purchase and receipt of ferrous metal or nonferrous metal and commercial metal property. The documentation shall include, at a minimum:(1) The date, time and value of the property being purchased or received.(2) A description of the predominant types of property being purchased or received.(c) Effect of establishing commercial account.--Once a commercial account is established, if no financial transaction occurs between the scrap processor or recycling facility operator and the person delivering scrap material, then the scrap processor or recycling facility operator need only maintain a photocopy of the driver's license of the person delivering the scrap material to comply with this subsection.(d) Financial transactions.--Once a commercial account has been established, if a financial transaction occurs between a scrap processor or recycling facility operator and a person 20250SB0914PN1210 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 delivering the scrap material, the scrap processor or recycling facility operator shall obtain the following before completing each transaction:(1) A photocopy of the driver's license of the person delivering the scrap materials.(2) The license plate number of the vehicle transporting scrap material.(3) The telephone number of the commercial account.(4) Confirmation that the person delivering the scrap material is authorized to receive a check or cash on behalf of the person or entity providing the scrap material. The confirmation shall consist of written, signed authorization from the owner or officer of the commercial enterprise stating that the person delivering the scrap material is designated to receive payment for the scrap material.(5) An acknowledgment of receipt of cash payment, signed by the person delivering the scrap material and receiving the cash payment.§ 3954. Restricted materials.A scrap processor and recycling facility operator may purchase the following scrap material only if the purchase occurs with a commercial enterprise:(1) New production scrap or new materials that are a part of a manufacturing process that are being sold by an individual, not a company.(2) Full sized, new materials, including those used in construction, or equipment and tools used by contractors.(3) Commercial metal property.(4) Metallic wire that has been burned in whole or in part to remove insulation, unless the aggregate value is less 20250SB0914PN1210 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 than $100.(5) Beer kegs.(6) Detached catalytic converters.(7) Railroad materials.§ 3955. Law enforcement.A scrap processor and recycling facility operator shall disclose seller registration information required by this act SUBCHAPTER during normal business hours to any investigative or law enforcement officer or any person acting at the direction or request of an investigative or law enforcement officer to investigate suspected criminal activities.§ 3956. Statewide registry of scrap processors and recycling facilities.The Pennsylvania State Police shall establish and maintain a Statewide registry of scrap processors and recycling facilities under section 3957 (relating to duty to register). The registry information shall be posted on the publicly accessible Internet website of the Pennsylvania State Police.§ 3957. Duty to register.(a) Duty.--A scrap processor and recycling facility shall register with the Pennsylvania State Police as provided in this section.(b) Information required.--A person shall register with the Pennsylvania State Police in accordance with subsection (e). The registrant must provide the following information:(1) For an individual applicant, all of the following:(i) Name.(ii) Driver's license number or a copy of an identification card issued by the state in which the individual resides.20250SB0914PN1210 - 10 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iii) Business name, address and telephone number.(iv) Federal employer identification number, if applicable.(2) For a general partnership applicant, all of the following:(i) Name of each partner.(ii) Driver's license number or a copy of an identification card issued by the state in which each partner resides, of each partner.(iii) Partnership name, address and telephone number.(iv) Federal employer identification number, if applicable.(3) For a corporation, limited liability company or limited partnership, all of the following:(i) Name of the registering officer, manager and general partner.(ii) Business name, address and telephone number.(iii) Name of each director or each individual holding greater than a 5% equity interest in the entity.(4) For an out-of-State corporation, limited liability company or limited partnership, the name and address of the entity's resident agent or registered office provider within this Commonwealth and any registration number or license number issued to the entity by the entity's home state or political subdivision of the other state, if applicable.(5) For a joint venture, the name, address and telephone number of the joint venture, as well as the name, address and telephone number of each party to the joint venture.(c) Reporting of multiple registrations.--An entity owning 20250SB0914PN1210 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 multiple scrap processing and recycling facilities must register the physical address of each scrap processing and recycling facility.(d) Registration fees.--The registration fee shall:(1) Be accompanied by a fee of $100 for each completed registration form for a scrap processor or renewal of registration. The following shall apply:(i) Within 14 business days after completion of the registration and payment of the fee, the Pennsylvania State Police shall issue the scrap processor and recycling facility operator a written notice of registration identifying the name of the applicant, scrap processing facility or recycling facility name and address and a registration number.(ii) The notice shall be valid for a period of two years.(iii) Renewals shall be on a biennial basis.(2) Be used to establish and maintain a database under this subchapter. Before July 1, 2016, money collected under paragraph (1) shall augment the money appropriated to the Pennsylvania State Police to be used to create an electronic database of registrations. The Pennsylvania State Police shall transmit a notice when the electronic database is operational to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin. After June 30, 2016, money collected under paragraph (1) shall be deposited in the General Fund.(e) Method of registration.--(1) Except as provided under paragraph (2), registration must be in writing on a form prescribed by the Pennsylvania 20250SB0914PN1210 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 State Police.(2) After publication of the notice under subsection (d)(2), the Pennsylvania State Police may require registration:(i) in writing on a form prescribed by the Pennsylvania State Police; or(ii) electronically.(f) Proof of registration.--A scrap processor and recycling facility operator shall include the registration number in all advertisements distributed within this Commonwealth and shall have the notice of registration clearly visible at its place of business.(g) Failure to register.--A scrap processor or recycling facility operator that fails to register commits a summary offense and shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to pay a fine of $1,000.§ 3958. Penalties.(a) Scrap processor and recycling facility operator penalties.-- Except as OPERATOR PENALTIES.-- (1) EXCEPT AS provided under section 3957(g) (relating to duty to register), a scrap processor and recycling facility operator who THAT violates this subchapter commits a summary offense and shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to pay a fine of up to $2,500. A second or subsequent violation shall be classified as a misdemeanor of the third degree.(2) THIS SUBSECTION SHALL NOT APPLY TO A VIOLATION OF SECTION 3955 (RELATING TO LAW ENFORCEMENT).(b) Motor vehicle penalties.--Upon a conviction of an offense under § 3921 (relating to theft by unlawful taking or disposition) or § 3925 (relating to receiving stolen property) that relates to the theft of scrap material or the 20250SB0914PN1210 - 13 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 transportation of stolen scrap material, the court may order the impoundment of any vehicle used in the act of theft of scrap material or the transportation of stolen scrap material in accordance with the following:(1) For a first offense, a vehicle may be impounded for at least 30 days, but not more than 60 days.(2) For a second or subsequent offense involving the same motor vehicle, the vehicle may be impounded for at least 60 days, but not more than 180 days.(3) The person convicted shall be responsible for any fees associated with or related to the impoundment of the vehicle.§ 3959. Preemption.This act SUBCHAPTER shall preempt and supersede any local ordinance or rule adopted after the effective date of this act SUBCHAPTER which seeks to regulate the processing of scrap materials.Section 2. Repeals are as follows:(1) The General Assembly declares that the repeal under paragraph (2) is necessary to effectuate the addition of 18 Pa.C.S. Ch. 39 Subch. C.(2) The act of October 9, 2008 (P.L.1408, No.113), known as the Scrap Material Theft Prevention Act, is repealed.Section 3. The addition of 18 Pa.C.S. Ch. 39 Subch. C is a continuation of the act of October 9, 2008 (P.L.1408, No.113), known as the Scrap Material Theft Prevention Act. The following apply:(1) Except as otherwise provided in 18 Pa.C.S. Ch. 39 Subch. C, all activities initiated under the Scrap Material Theft Prevention Act shall continue and remain in full force 20250SB0914PN1210 - 14 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and effect and may be completed under 18 Pa.C.S. Ch. 39 Subch. C. Orders, regulations, rules and decisions which were made under the Scrap Material Theft Prevention Act and which are in effect on the effective date of section 2(2) of this act shall remain in full force and effect until revoked, vacated or modified under 18 Pa.C.S. Ch. 39 Subch C. Contracts, obligations and collective bargaining agreements entered into under the Scrap Material Theft Prevention Act are not affected nor impaired by the repeal of the Scrap Material Theft Prevention Act.(2) Any difference in language between 18 Pa.C.S. Ch. 39 Subch. C and the Scrap Material Theft Prevention Act is intended only to conform to the style of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes and is not intended to change or affect the legislative intent, judicial construction or administration and implementation of the Scrap Material Theft Prevention Act.Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0914PN1210 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718